Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-811.01
Docket fee; disposition.

Any person who files a petition with the Commission of Industrial Relations pursuant to section 48-811 shall, at the time of such filing, pay a docket fee of one hundred dollars to the clerk of such commission. All fees so collected shall be deposited in the state treasury and by the State Treasurer credited to the General Fund.

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 1.